District of Columbia statutes.
19-602.06

Applicability of subchapter.

The provisions of part B concerning beneficial ownership as between parties or as between parties and beneficiaries apply only to controversies between those persons and their creditors and other successors, and do not apply to the right of those persons to payment as determined by the terms of the account. Part C governs the liability and set-off rights of financial institutions that make payments pursuant to it.

History

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 302(b), 48 DCR 2087

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 206 of the Uniform Nonprobate Transfers on Death Act (1991 Act).